Utah statutes.
4-24-22.   Travel permit in lieu of brand inspection certificate -- Fees -- Permit to accompany animal.

The department may issue a permit upon the payment of a fee determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2), in lieu of a certificate of brand inspection, for the transport of any show horse, show mule, or show cattle within or outside the state.  The words "travel permit" shall be stamped or printed on the permit.  A permit shall accompany each show animal while it is in transit and shall identify the animal to which it applies by age, sex, color, brand, mark, and scars. A travel permit is valid for the calendar year of the date of issuance, which date shall appear on the permit.



Amended by Chapter 130, 1985 General Session

